Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 2 Protection of Minor

29-2-20.
Rights of minor; impact on testamentary capacity.

In every guardianship, the minor has the right to:

A qualified guardian who acts in the best interest of the minor;

A guardian who is reasonably accessible to the minor;

Have his or her property utilized as necessary for his or her support, care, education, health, and welfare; and

Individually or through the minor’s representative or legal counsel, bring an action relating to the guardianship.

The appointment of a guardian is not a determination that a minor who is 14 years of age or older lacks testamentary capacity.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Direction of notice where owner a minor under disability, appointment of guardian ad litem, §

22-2-21

.

29-2-21.
Power of guardian over minor; obligations of guardians; liability of guardian.

The power of a guardian over the minor shall be the same as that of a parent over a child; the guardian standing in place of the parent. A guardian shall at all times act as a fiduciary in the minor’s best interest and exercise reasonable care, diligence, and prudence.

A guardian shall:

Respect the rights and dignity of the minor;

Arrange for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the minor considering the minor’s available resources;

Take reasonable care of the minor’s personal effects;

Expend money of the minor that has been received by the guardian for the minor’s current needs for support, care, education, health, and welfare;

Conserve for the minor’s future needs any excess money of the minor received by the guardian; provided, however, that if a conservator has been appointed for the minor, the guardian shall pay to the conservator, at least quarterly, money to be conserved for the minor’s future needs;

If necessary, petition to have a conservator appointed;

Endeavor to cooperate with the conservator, if any;

Within 60 days after appointment and within 60 days after each anniversary date of appointment, file with the court and provide to the conservator, if any, a personal status report concerning the minor, which shall include:

A description of the minor’s general condition, changes since the last report, and the minor’s needs;

All addresses of the minor during the reporting period and the living arrangements of the minor for all addresses; and

Recommendations for any alteration in the guardianship order;

Promptly notify the court of any conflict of interest between the minor and the guardian when the conflict arises or becomes known to the guardian and take such action as is required by Code Section 29-2-23;

Keep the court informed of the guardian’s current address; and

Act promptly to terminate the guardianship when the minor dies, reaches age 18, is adopted, or is emancipated.

A guardian, solely by reason of the guardian-minor relationship, is not personally liable for:

The minor’s expenses;

Contracts entered into in the guardian’s fiduciary capacity;

The acts or omissions of the minor;

Obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the minor; or

Other acts or omissions occurring in the course of the guardianship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Rights and duties of permanent guardians of juveniles, §

15-11-242

.

Parent and child relationship generally, §

19-7-1

et seq.

29-2-22.
Authority of guardian; appointment of guardian ad litem.

The appointment of a guardian shall vest in the guardian the exclusive power, without court order, to:

Take custody of the person of the minor and establish the minor’s place of dwelling within this state;

Subject to Chapters 9, 20, and 36 of Title 31 and any other pertinent law, give any consent or approval that may be necessary for medical or other professional care, counsel, treatment, or services for the minor;

Bring, defend, or participate in legal, equitable, or administrative proceedings, including alternative dispute resolution, as are appropriate for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor in the name of or on behalf of the minor;

Execute a surrender of rights to enable the adoption of the minor pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 19 or the adoption laws of any other state; and

Exercise those other powers reasonably necessary to provide adequately for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the minor.

At the time of the appointment of the guardian or at any time thereafter, any of the following powers may be specifically granted by the court to the guardian upon such notice, if any, as the court shall determine, provided that no disposition of the minor’s property shall be made without the involvement of a conservator, if any:

To establish the minor’s place of dwelling outside this state;

To change the jurisdiction of the guardianship to another county in this state that is the county of the minor’s place of dwelling, pursuant to Code Section 29-2-60;

To change the domicile of the minor to the minor’s or the guardian’s place of dwelling, in the determination of which the court shall consider the tax ramifications and the succession and inheritance rights of the minor and other parties;

To consent to the marriage of the minor;

To receive reasonable compensation from the estate of the minor for services rendered to the minor; and

If there is no conservator, to disclaim or renounce any property or interest in property of the minor in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 53-1-20.

Before granting any of the powers described in subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor and shall give notice to any natural guardian of the minor.

In granting any of the powers described in subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall consider the property rights of the minor and the views of the conservator, if available, or, if there is no conservator, of others who have custody of the minor’s property.

In performing any of the acts described in this Code section, the guardian shall act in coordination and cooperation with the conservator or, if there is no conservator, with others who have custody of the minor’s property.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 800, § 5/HB 388; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

Cross references.

Service of process on guardian of incapacitated adult, § 9-11-4(l)(4).

Appointment of guardian ad litem, §

15-11-9

.

Rights and duties of permanent guardians of juveniles, §

15-11-242

.

Powers of sale when exercisable by successor administrator, trustee, or guardian, §

23-2-116

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 800, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Option of Adoption Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article, “The Child as a Party in Interest in Custody Proceedings,” see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 577 (1974).

29-2-23.
Conflicts of interest.

The guardian must disclose promptly any conflict of interest between the guardian and the minor when it arises or becomes known to the guardian and seek the court’s determination as to whether the conflict is insubstantial or if it is in the best interest of the minor for the guardian to continue to serve.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Rights and duties of permanent guardians of juveniles, §

15-11-242

.

29-2-24.
Oath required of guardian.

Before entering upon the duties of the appointment, every guardian appointed pursuant to the terms of this chapter shall take an oath or affirmation before the court to perform well and truly the duties required of a guardian and to account faithfully for the estate. The oath or affirmation of a guardian may be subscribed before the judge or clerk of any probate court of this state. The judge of the probate court who appoints the guardian shall have the authority to grant a commission to a judge or clerk of any court of record of any other state to administer the oath or affirmation.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Rights and duties of permanent guardians of juveniles, §

15-11-242

.

29-2-25.
Bond requirements.

A guardian may be required to give bond with good and sufficient security in such amount as the court may determine from time to time.

The clerk of the court shall record bonds in books kept for that purpose and shall retain custody of the bonds.

If a guardian is required to give bond and has given as security one or more licensed commercial sureties authorized to transact business in this state, the bond premium shall, upon the request of the guardian, be paid from the estate of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 1/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted “shall, upon the request of the guardian, be paid from the estate of the minor” for “may be paid as part of the cost of administration” in subsection (c).

Cross references.

Time limitation on bringing of actions against guardians, §

9-3-27

.

Statute of limitations for prosecution for conversion by guardian of property of ward, §

17-3-2

.